src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_utf8_alias.aff
FLAG num
SFX 420 Y 7
SFX 420 0 َّهُ/201 . 284
SFX 420 0 َّهُما/201 . 284
SFX 420 0 َّهُم/201 . 284
SFX 420 0 َّها/201 . 284
SFX 420 0 َّهُنَّ/201 . 284
SFX 420 0 َّنِي/201 . 284
SFX 420 0 َّنا/201 . 284
SFX 416 Y 7
SFX 416 0 َّهُ/175 . 284
SFX 416 0 َّهُما/175 . 284
SFX 416 0 َّهُم/175 . 284
SFX 416 0 َّها/175 . 284
SFX 416 0 َّهُنَّ/175 . 284
SFX 416 0 َّنِي/175 . 284
SFX 416 0 َّنا/175 . 284
SFX 77 Y 5
SFX 77 0 كَ/152 . 303
SFX 77 0 كِ/152 . 303
SFX 77 0 كُما/152 . 303
SFX 77 0 كُم/152 . 303
SFX 77 0 كُنَّ/152 . 303
SFX 412 Y 7
SFX 412 0 هُ/170 . 263
SFX 412 0 هُما/170 . 263
SFX 412 0 هُم/170 . 263
SFX 412 0 ها/170 . 263
SFX 412 0 هُنَّ/170 . 263
SFX 412 0 نِي/170 . 263
SFX 412 0 نا/170 . 263
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 0 َ/152 . 306
SFX 557 Y 5
SFX 557 0 ه/188 . 236
SFX 557 0 هما/188 . 236
SFX 557 0 هم/188 . 236
SFX 557 0 ها/188 . 236
SFX 557 0 هنَّ/188 . 236
SFX 558 Y 5
SFX 558 0 كَ/188 . 239
SFX 558 0 كِ/188 . 239
SFX 558 0 كُما/188 . 239
SFX 558 0 كُم/188 . 239
SFX 558 0 كُنَّ/188 . 239
SFX 97 Y 13
SFX 97 0 ا/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اهُ/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اهُما/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اهُم/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اها/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اهُنَّ/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اكَ/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اكِ/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اكُما/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اكُم/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 اكُنَّ/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 ايَ/146 . 245
SFX 97 0 انا/146 . 245
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 0 َة/146 . 246
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 0 انِ/146 . 249
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 ِي/146 . 292
SFX 54 Y 2
SFX 54 0 ْنَ/152 . 308
SFX 54 0 ْنا/152 . 308
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 0 ات/146 . 256
SFX 382 Y 7
SFX 382 0 ُوهُ/195 . 253
SFX 382 0 ُوهُما/195 . 253
SFX 382 0 ُوهُم/195 . 253
SFX 382 0 ُوها/195 . 253
SFX 382 0 ُوهُنَّ/195 . 253
SFX 382 0 ُونِي/195 . 253
SFX 382 0 ُونا/195 . 253
SFX 58 Y 6
SFX 58 0 ْتُ/152 . 309
SFX 58 0 ْتَ/152 . 309
SFX 58 0 ْتِ/152 . 309
SFX 58 0 ْتُما/152 . 309
SFX 58 0 ْتُم/152 . 309
SFX 58 0 ْتُنَّ/152 . 309
SFX 75 Y 5
SFX 75 0 هُ/152 . 339
SFX 75 0 هُما/152 . 339
SFX 75 0 هُم/152 . 339
SFX 75 0 ها/152 . 339
SFX 75 0 هُنَّ/152 . 339
SFX 76 Y 5
SFX 76 0 هُ/152 . 340
SFX 76 0 هُما/152 . 340
SFX 76 0 هُم/152 . 340
SFX 76 0 ها/152 . 340
SFX 76 0 هُنَّ/152 . 340
SFX 292 Y 1
SFX 292 0 َتَيْنِ/144 . 276
SFX 460 Y 7
SFX 460 0 ُوهُ/163 . 253
SFX 460 0 ُوهُما/163 . 253
SFX 460 0 ُوهُم/163 . 253
SFX 460 0 ُوها/163 . 253
SFX 460 0 ُوهُنَّ/163 . 253
SFX 460 0 ُونِي/163 . 253
SFX 460 0 ُونا/163 . 253
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 ِينَ/169 . 266
SFX 461 Y 5
SFX 461 0 ُوكَ/163 . 255
SFX 461 0 ُوكِ/163 . 255
SFX 461 0 ُوكُما/163 . 255
SFX 461 0 ُوكُم/163 . 255
SFX 461 0 ُوكُنَّ/163 . 255
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 0/152 . 311
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 0 َتَيْنِ/159 . 276
SFX 571 Y 2
SFX 571 0 نِي/185 . 231
SFX 571 0 نا/185 . 231
SFX 523 Y 7
SFX 523 0 هُ/203 . 263
SFX 523 0 هُما/203 . 263
SFX 523 0 هُم/203 . 263
SFX 523 0 ها/203 . 263
SFX 523 0 هُنَّ/203 . 263
SFX 523 0 نِي/203 . 263
SFX 523 0 نا/203 . 263
SFX 13 Y 13
SFX 13 0 0/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 هُ/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 هُما/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 هُم/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 ها/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 هُنَّ/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 كَ/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 كِ/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 كُما/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 كُم/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 كُنَّ/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 يَ/152 . 313
SFX 13 0 نا/152 . 313
SFX 524 Y 5
SFX 524 0 كَ/203 . 225
SFX 524 0 كِ/203 . 225
SFX 524 0 كُما/203 . 225
SFX 524 0 كُم/203 . 225
SFX 524 0 كُنَّ/203 . 225
SFX 334 Y 2
SFX 334 0 نِي/176 . 231
SFX 334 0 نا/176 . 231
SFX 335 Y 1
SFX 335 0 0/176 . 229
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 َةِ/144 . 270
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 0 آت/152 . 293
SFX 42 Y 13
SFX 42 0 َتَيْ/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْهِ/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْهِما/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْهِم/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْها/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْهِنَّ/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْكَ/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْكِ/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْكُما/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْكُم/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْكُنَّ/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيَّ/152 . 327
SFX 42 0 َتَيْنا/152 . 327
SFX 394 Y 7
SFX 394 0 هُ/206 . 263
SFX 394 0 هُما/206 . 263
SFX 394 0 هُم/206 . 263
SFX 394 0 ها/206 . 263
SFX 394 0 هُنَّ/206 . 263
SFX 394 0 نِي/206 . 263
SFX 394 0 نا/206 . 263
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 ُوا/160 . 283
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 0 ا/205 . 242
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 نِ/206 . 227
SFX 373 Y 7
SFX 373 0 ُونَهُ/161 . 279
SFX 373 0 ُونَهُما/161 . 279
SFX 373 0 ُونَهُم/161 . 279
SFX 373 0 ُونَها/161 . 279
SFX 373 0 ُونَهُنَّ/161 . 279
SFX 373 0 ُونَنِي/161 . 279
SFX 373 0 ُونَنا/161 . 279
SFX 414 Y 7
SFX 414 0 ْنَهُ/175 . 238
SFX 414 0 ْنَهُما/175 . 238
SFX 414 0 ْنَهُم/175 . 238
SFX 414 0 ْنَها/175 . 238
SFX 414 0 ْنَهُنَّ/175 . 238
SFX 414 0 ْنَنِي/175 . 238
SFX 414 0 ْنَنا/175 . 238
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 ُوا/193 . 232
SFX 61 Y 45
SFX 61 0 ُّهُ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّهُما/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّهُم/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّها/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّهُنَّ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 َّهُ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 َّهُما/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 َّهُم/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 َّها/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 َّهُنَّ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ِّهِ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ِّهِما/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ِّهِم/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ِّها/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ِّهِنَّ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّكَ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّكِ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّكُما/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّكُم/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّكُنَّ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 َّنِي/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 َّنا/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ِّنِي/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ِّنا/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّماهُ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّماهُما/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّماهُم/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّماها/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّماهُنَّ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمانِي/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمانا/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمُوهُ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمُوهُما/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمُوهُم/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمُوها/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمُوهُنَّ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمُونِي/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّمُونا/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّنَّهُ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّنَّهُما/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّنَّهُم/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّنَّها/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّنَّهُنَّ/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّنَّنِي/152 . 226
SFX 61 0 ُّنَّنا/152 . 226
SFX 361 Y 7
SFX 361 0 ُونَهُ/150 . 279
SFX 361 0 ُونَهُما/150 . 279
SFX 361 0 ُونَهُم/150 . 279
SFX 361 0 ُونَها/150 . 279
SFX 361 0 ُونَهُنَّ/150 . 279
SFX 361 0 ُونَنِي/150 . 279
SFX 361 0 ُونَنا/150 . 279
SFX 415 Y 1
SFX 415 0 َّ/175 . 241
SFX 374 Y 5
SFX 374 0 ُونَكَ/161 . 280
SFX 374 0 ُونَكِ/161 . 280
SFX 374 0 ُونَكُما/161 . 280
SFX 374 0 ُونَكُم/161 . 280
SFX 374 0 ُونَكُنَّ/161 . 280
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 ْ/152 . 330
SFX 362 Y 5
SFX 362 0 ُونَكَ/150 . 280
SFX 362 0 ُونَكِ/150 . 280
SFX 362 0 ُونَكُما/150 . 280
SFX 362 0 ُونَكُم/150 . 280
SFX 362 0 ُونَكُنَّ/150 . 280
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 َة/169 . 246
SFX 122 Y 13
SFX 122 0 َيْ/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْهِ/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْهِما/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْهِم/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْها/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْهِنَّ/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْكَ/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْكِ/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْكُما/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْكُم/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْكُنَّ/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيَّ/146 . 316
SFX 122 0 َيْنا/146 . 316
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 0 ِي/152 . 333
SFX 294 Y 12
SFX 294 0 َهُ/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َهُما/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َهُم/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َها/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َهُنَّ/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َكَ/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َكِ/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َكُما/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َكُم/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َكُنَّ/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َنِي/160 . 289
SFX 294 0 َنا/160 . 289
SFX 162 Y 5
SFX 162 0 هُ/146 . 340
SFX 162 0 هُما/146 . 340
SFX 162 0 هُم/146 . 340
SFX 162 0 ها/146 . 340
SFX 162 0 هُنَّ/146 . 340
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 0 يَ/152 . 341
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 ِي/169 . 292
SFX 577 Y 5
SFX 577 0 ه/192 . 236
SFX 577 0 هما/192 . 236
SFX 577 0 هم/192 . 236
SFX 577 0 ها/192 . 236
SFX 577 0 هنَّ/192 . 236
SFX 18 Y 2
SFX 18 0 اتٍ/152 . 331
SFX 18 0 اتٍ/152 . 331
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 َيْنِ/146 . 277
SFX 578 Y 5
SFX 578 0 كَ/192 . 239
SFX 578 0 كِ/192 . 239
SFX 578 0 كُما/192 . 239
SFX 578 0 كُم/192 . 239
SFX 578 0 كُنَّ/192 . 239
SFX 17 Y 1
SFX 17 0 اتٌ/152 . 342
SFX 575 Y 2
SFX 575 0 نِي/200 . 231
SFX 575 0 نا/200 . 231
SFX 304 Y 22
SFX 304 0 َّهُ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّهُما/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّهُم/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّها/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّهُنَّ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّكَ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّكِ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّكُما/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّكُم/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّكُنَّ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّنِي/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 َّنا/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاهُ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاهُما/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاهُم/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاها/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاهُنَّ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاكَ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاكِ/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاكُما/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاكُم/160 . 287
SFX 304 0 ّاكُنَّ/160 . 287
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 ات/169 . 256
SFX 342 Y 5
SFX 342 0 ه/148 . 236
SFX 342 0 هما/148 . 236
SFX 342 0 هم/148 . 236
SFX 342 0 ها/148 . 236
SFX 342 0 هنَّ/148 . 236
SFX 296 Y 12
SFX 296 0 اهُ/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اهُما/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اهُم/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اها/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اهُنَّ/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اكَ/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اكِ/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اكُما/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اكُم/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 اكُنَّ/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 انِي/160 . 290
SFX 296 0 انا/160 . 290
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 0 ا/145 . 242
SFX 299 Y 2
SFX 299 0 َت/160 . 291
SFX 299 0 َتا/160 . 291
SFX 346 Y 7
SFX 346 0 ِيهِ/174 . 312
SFX 346 0 ِيهِما/174 . 312
SFX 346 0 ِيهِم/174 . 312
SFX 346 0 ِيها/174 . 312
SFX 346 0 ِيهِنَّ/174 . 312
SFX 346 0 ِينِي/174 . 312
SFX 346 0 ِينا/174 . 312
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 ِينَ/174 . 343
SFX 310 Y 12
SFX 310 0 ُوهُ/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوهُما/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوهُم/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوها/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوهُنَّ/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوكَ/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوكِ/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوكُما/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوكُم/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُوكُنَّ/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُونِي/160 . 288
SFX 310 0 ُونا/160 . 288
SFX 199 Y 2
SFX 199 0 اتِ/156 . 254
SFX 199 0 اتِ/156 . 254
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 0/207 . 229
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 ا/160 . 302
SFX 386 Y 7
SFX 386 0 ُوهُ/193 . 253
SFX 386 0 ُوهُما/193 . 253
SFX 386 0 ُوهُم/193 . 253
SFX 386 0 ُوها/193 . 253
SFX 386 0 ُوهُنَّ/193 . 253
SFX 386 0 ُونِي/193 . 253
SFX 386 0 ُونا/193 . 253
SFX 466 Y 7
SFX 466 0 اهُ/190 . 234
SFX 466 0 اهُما/190 . 234
SFX 466 0 اهُم/190 . 234
SFX 466 0 اها/190 . 234
SFX 466 0 اهُنَّ/190 . 234
SFX 466 0 انِي/190 . 234
SFX 466 0 انا/190 . 234
SFX 19 Y 45
SFX 19 0 اته/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتهما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتهم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتها/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتهنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتكَ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتكِ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتكُما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتكُم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتكُنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِي/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتنا/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُهُ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُهُما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُهُم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُها/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُهُنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُكَ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُكِ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُكُما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُكُم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُكُنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتُنا/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِها/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكَ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكِ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكُما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكُم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكُنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِنا/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِها/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِهِنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكَ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكِ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكُما/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكُم/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِكُنَّ/152 . 334
SFX 19 0 اتِنا/152 . 334
SFX 467 Y 5
SFX 467 0 اكَ/190 . 295
SFX 467 0 اكِ/190 . 295
SFX 467 0 اكُما/190 . 295
SFX 467 0 اكُم/190 . 295
SFX 467 0 اكُنَّ/190 . 295
SFX 16 Y 2
SFX 16 0 اتِ/152 . 254
SFX 16 0 اتِ/152 . 254
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 انِ/190 . 240
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 0/188 . 229
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 0 0/205 . 268
SFX 585 Y 5
SFX 585 0 ه/178 . 236
SFX 585 0 هما/178 . 236
SFX 585 0 هم/178 . 236
SFX 585 0 ها/178 . 236
SFX 585 0 هنَّ/178 . 236
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 ْنَ/171 . 275
SFX 15 Y 1
SFX 15 0 اتُ/152 . 299
SFX 586 Y 5
SFX 586 0 كَ/178 . 239
SFX 586 0 كِ/178 . 239
SFX 586 0 كُما/178 . 239
SFX 586 0 كُم/178 . 239
SFX 586 0 كُنَّ/178 . 239
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 َ/160 . 306
SFX 595 Y 5
SFX 595 0 ه/198 . 236
SFX 595 0 هما/198 . 236
SFX 595 0 هم/198 . 236
SFX 595 0 ها/198 . 236
SFX 595 0 هنَّ/198 . 236
